New Jersey, session 221, S2618.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     As used in this section, proprietary school means a postsecondary institution in New Jersey that is operated for profit and which has been authorized to offer licensed degree programs. b.    (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection c. of this section, the Secretary of Higher Education shall revoke a proprietary schools license to award academic degrees if, by the completion of the sixth full academic year that occurs following the effective date of this act, the school fails to achieve a six-year graduation rate of at least 75 percent for full-time students who are enrolled in a four-year degree program. (2)   Except as otherwise provided in subsection c. of this section, the Secretary of Higher Education shall revoke a proprietary schools license to award academic degrees if, by the completion of the sixth full academic year that occurs following the effective date of this act, the school fails to achieve a three-year graduation rate of at least 75 percent for full-time students who are enrolled in a two-year degree program. c.     If, at the completion of the fifth full academic year that occurs following the effective date of this act, a proprietary school is not on track to achieve the minimum graduation rates specified in subsection b. of this section, but is making sufficient progress toward achieving the rates, the secretary, at the discretion of the secretary, may allow the school additional time to achieve the rates before revoking the schools license to award academic degrees. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.